lib/pyphen/dictionaries/hyph_es_AR.dic
ult2r
ultra1a2
ultra1e2
ultra1i2
ultra1o2
ultra1u2
ultra1á2
ultra1é2
ultra1í2
ultra1ó2
ultra1ú2
xeno1h
xe1n
xeno1a2
xeno1e2
xeno1i2
xeno1o2
xeno1u2
xeno1á2
xeno1é2
xeno1í2
xeno1ó2
xeno1ú2
inter4é1s
inte1r
inte1r4esa1r
intere1s
i1n3te3r4i3n
inter4ino
inte1r4io1r
mili4a1r
mili4a3rio
para4íso
paraí1s
para4ulata
parau1l
paraula1t
super4able
supera1b
superab2l
super4ació1n
supera1c
supe1r4io1r
tran4sa2c1c
tra1n
tra2n1s
transa1c
t1rans4a1r
trans4eúnte
transeú1n
1transeú2n1t
t1rans4ibe1r
transi1b
tra1ns4ició1n
transi1c
trans4ido
transi1d
tra1ns4ige1n
transi1g
t1rans4igi1r
t1rans4isto1r
transi1s
1transi2s1t
1trans4i1t
trans4ita1b
trans4itorio
transito1r
trans4ubsta
transu1b
tran1su2b1s
1transub2s1t
ultra4ísmo
ultraí1s
ultraí2s1m
wa3s4h
wa1s
.bi1anua1l
.bia1n
.bi1au1r
.bien1a2n1d
.bie1n2
.biena1n
.bien1apa
.biena1p
.bien1ave
.biena1v
.bien1e2s1t
.biene1s
.bien1i2n1t
.bieni1n
.bi1o1x
.bi1ó2x
.bi1u1n
.en1acei1t
.ena1c
.en1aci1y
.en1aguac4h
.ena1g
.enagua1c
.en1agua1z
.en1anc4h
.ena1n
.ena2n1c
.en1apa
.ena1p
.en1a2r1b
.ena1r
.en1a2r1t
.en2a1rt2r
.en1e1j
.hepta1e
.he1p
.he2p1t
.intra1o2
.int2r
.intra1u2
.mal1aco1n
.mala1c
.mal1aco1s
.mala1e
.mal1anda2n1t
.mala1n
.mala2n1d
.mala1nda1n
.mal1anda2n1z
.mal1e2s1t
.male1s
.mal1i2n1t
.mali1n
.pa4n1a4meri
.pa1n
.pana1m
.paname1r
.pa4n1euro1p
.paneu1r
.pa4n1afri
.pana1f
.panaf2r
.pa4n1ópti
.panó1p
.panó2p1t
3p2si1c
3p2si1q
.re3a2e1g
.re3a2q
.re3a2z
.re3a2gru1p
.rea1g
.reag2r
.re3i2m
.re3i2n1c
.re3i2n1g
.re3i2n1s
.re3i2n1t
.re3o2b
.re1o1c
.re1o1j
.re3orga
.reo1r
.reo2r1g
.re1u2n1t
.retro1a2
.re1t
.ret2r
.su2d1a2f2r
.su1d
.suda1f
.su2d1a2me
.suda1m
.su2d1e2s1t
.sude1s
1su4d3oe1s
su1d
.sur1a2me
.su1r
.sura1m
.sur1e2s1t
.sure1s
.sur1oe1s
.tele1i2m1p
.tele1i2
.te1l
.telei1m
.tele1o2b1j
.tele1o2
.teleo1b
.tra2s1a
.t2r
.tra1s
.tra2s1o
.tra2s2o1ñ
.tran2s1a2l1p
.tra1n
.tra2n1s
.transa1l
.tran2s1a2n1d
.transa1n
.tran2s1a2t2l
.transa1t
.tran2s1oce
.transo1c
.t1ran2s1u1r
.tri1ó2x
